Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1459
Dwelling unit, defined.

Dwelling unit shall mean a mobile home or the part of a mobile home that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common household but shall not include any real property used to accommodate a mobile home.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 10.